Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,149
Soil and water conservation vehicles; registration fee.

(1) For the registration of trucks or combinations of trucks, truck-tractors, or trailers which are not for hire and engaged in soil and water conservation work and used for the purpose of transporting pipe and equipment exclusively used by such contractors for soil and water conservation construction, the registration fee shall be one-half of the rate for similar commercial motor vehicles registered under section 60-3,147, except that no commercial motor vehicle or commercial trailer registered under this section shall be registered for a fee of less than eighteen dollars.

(2) Such license plates shall display, in addition to the registration number, the letter A.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 149.